Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

§ 33-16-101.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 3630; Laws 1925, ch. 57, § 1; 1929, ch. 137, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 37-104; Laws 1933, ch. 128, § 1; 1937, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1204; W.S. 1957, § 33-14; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1975, ch. 31, § 1; 1979, ch. 115, § 1; 1991, ch. 112, § 1; ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-102.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 14; C.S. 1920, § 3639; R.S. 1931, § 37-113; C.S. 1945, § 37-1214; W.S. 1957, § 33-215; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 14 , related to embalmers register.

§ 33-16-103.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1933, ch. 120, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1205; W.S. 1957, § 33-216; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1933, ch. 120, § 1, related to foreign licenses of embalmers.

§ 33-16-104.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3631; Laws 1925, ch. 57, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 37-105; C.S. 1945, § 37-1206; W.S. 1957, § 33-217; Laws 1969, ch. 156, § 1; 1975, ch. 31, § 1; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 6 , related to embalmers annual renewal of registration.

§ 33-16-105.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 13; C.S. 1920, § 3638; R.S. 1931, § 37-112; C.S. 1945, § 37-1213; W.S. 1957, § 33-218; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 13, related to embalmers exempt from jury service.

§ 33-16-106.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3632; R.S. 1931, § 37-106; C.S. 1945, § 37-1207; W.S. 1957, § 33-219; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 7, related to unlawful practice and transportation of embalmers.

§ 33-16-107.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 3635; R.S. 1931, § 37-109; C.S. 1945, § 37-1210; W.S. 1957, § 33-220; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 10, related to privileges of embalmers as to use of bodies for dissecting, demonstrating or teaching.

§ 33-16-108.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 3636; R.S. 1931, § 37-110; C.S. 1945, § 37-1211; W.S. 1957, § 33-221; Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 3; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 11, related to when cororner's permission to embalm required.

§ 33-16-109.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 3637; R.S. 1931, § 37-111; C.S. 1945, § 37-1212; W.S. 1957, § 33-222; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 12, related to .shipping pasters.

§ 33-16-110.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 3634; R.S. 1931, § 37-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-1209; W.S. 1957, § 33-223; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 9, related to .prohibited acts of embalmers.

§ 33-16-111.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, §
2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1, related to .exceptions.